Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3171
Adoption Tax Credit Act, how cited.

Sections 77-3171 to 77-3173 shall be known and may be cited as the Adoption Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2025, LB647, § 7.